Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1332
Unauthorized possession of receptacle; penalty.

(1) A person commits unauthorized possession of receptacle if having in possession or under control any receptacle bearing any name, mark, or device recorded as provided in section 28-1330, and holding a written transfer or bill of sale therefor from the person named in the certificate issued by the Secretary of State as provided in such section, or other authority in writing from such person, he fails or refuses to deliver such receptacle to the person named in such certificate or to the authorized agent of such person when demanded.

(2) Unauthorized possession of receptacle is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 316.